Hawaii statutes.
§338-4 Deaths reported to county clerks.
The department of health shall within six weeks after the end of each month
deliver, or forward by mail, to the county clerk of each county a list of the
names of all citizens of voting age or over whose deaths have been recorded in
the department during each month. The list shall set forth such portion of the
information contained in the death record of each citizen whose death is so
reported as will be of assistance to the county clerk in identification. [L 1949,
c 327, §7; RL 1955, §57-6; am L 1959, c 138, §1; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §19; HRS
§338-4; am L 1981, c 113, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next